Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 1, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as modified by legislative or Emergency Board action, is decreased by
$107,928,325.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (1), chapter 453, Oregon Laws  2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for fire protection, is increased  by $82,131,814, for net
large fire costs associated with the 2024 fire season.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $109,368,186, for deposit into  the State Forestry Department
Cash Flow Repayment Fund established under ORS 526.122, for cash flow purposes.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 453, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  453, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for fire  protection, is increased by $15,000,000,
for 2024 fire season expenditures.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (8), chapter 453, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest  Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 453, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the  State Forestry Department, for the equipment pool, is increased by
$2,000,000, for 2024 fire season expenditures.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$109,368,186 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the State Forestry Department from the State Forestry  Department
Cash Flow Repayment Fund established under ORS 526.122.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5801 (SB 5801-INTRO) Page 1
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of the  State Fire Marshal by section 1, chapter 224, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $8,390,464, for fire costs.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of the State Fire Marshal by section  1, chapter 224, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased  by $18,205,741, for fire costs cash
flow.
SECTION 9. This 2024 special session Act being necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health  and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2024 special
session Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by Senate December 12, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House December 12, 2024
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5801 (SB 5801-INTRO) Page 2